Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB282.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The sum of $64,523,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated from the Public School Employees' Retirement Fund to the Public School Employees' Retirement Board for the payment of all salaries, wages and other compensation and travel expenses of the employees and members of the Public School Employees' Retirement Board, for contractual services and other expenses necessary for the proper conduct of the duties, functions and activities of the board for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.Section 2. The sum of $1,405,000, or as much thereof as may 1234567891011121314151617181920 be necessary, is hereby appropriated from the PSERS Defined Contribution Fund authorized under section 1799.8-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, to the Public School Employees' Retirement Board for the payment of all salaries, wages and other compensation and travel expenses of the employees and members of the Public School Employees' Retirement Board, for contractual services and other expenses necessary for the proper conduct of the duties, functions and activities of the board related to the administration of the School Employees' Defined Contribution Plan established under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 84 (relating to School Employees' Defined Contribution Plan) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0282PN0259 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516